Maryland, session 2026, SB0155.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
21–1202.
(a) Every person operating a bicycle or a motor scooter in a public bicycle area
has all the rights granted to and is subject to all the duties required of the driver of a vehicle
by this title, including the duties set forth in § 21–504 of this title, except:
(1) As otherwise provided in this subtitle; and
(2) For those provisions of this title that by their very nature cannot apply.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0155*

SENATE BILL 155
(b) (1) Subject to paragraphs (2), (3), and (4) of this subsection, a person has
the rights and is subject to the restrictions applicable to pedestrians under this title while
the person is lawfully operating a bicycle, play vehicle, or unicycle:
(i) On a sidewalk or sidewalk area; or
(ii) In or through a crosswalk.
(2) (I) [At] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, AT an intersection, a person operating a bicycle, play vehicle, or unicycle is
subject to all traffic control signals, as provided in §§ 21–202 and 21–203 of this title.
(II) 1. UNLESS OTHERWISE DIRECTED BY A TRAFFIC
CONTROL DEVICE, A PERSON OPERATING A BICYCLE, PLAY VEHICLE, OR UNICYCLE
AT AN INTERSECTION WHO IS FACING A RED SIGNAL MAY ENTER THE INTERSECTION
TO CROSS THE HIGHWAY IN THE DIRECTION OF A PEDESTRIAN CONTROL “WALK”
SIGNAL DISPLAYED FOR THE PORTION OF THE HIGHWAY ON WHICH THE BICYCLE,
PLAY VEHICLE, OR UNICYCLE IS TRAVELING.
2. BEFORE ENTERING AN INTERSECTION AS DESCRIBED
IN SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 1 OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH, A PERSON OPERATING A
BICYCLE, PLAY VEHICLE, OR UNICYCLE SHALL YIELD THE RIGHT–OF–WAY TO ANY
VEHICLE OR PEDESTRIAN LAWFULLY USING THE INTERSECTION.
(3) A person operating a bicycle, play vehicle, or unicycle on a sidewalk or
sidewalk area or in or through a crosswalk shall yield the right–of–way to a pedestrian or
a person riding on an electric personal assistive mobility device.
(4) Section 21–506 of this title does not apply to a person operating a
bicycle, play vehicle, or unicycle.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.